Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-636
Lottery supplies; requirements.

(1) All lottery supplies shall be constructed to conform in all respects to the provisions and specifications imposed by the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act as to the manufacture, assembly, printing, and packaging of lottery supplies.

(2) Any lottery supplies which do not conform in all respects to the requirements of the act and any other specifications imposed by the department by rule and regulation shall be contraband goods for purposes of section 9-649.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 76;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 12.